Alabama, session 2026rs, HB362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Sections 31-2B-4, 31-2B-5, 31-2B-6, 31-2B-7,
12 31-2B-8, 31-2B-9, 31-2B-10, 31-2B-11, 31-2B-12, and 31-2B-13,
13 as added by Act 2025-104, 2025 Regular Session, Code of
14 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
15 "§31-2B-4
16 (a) The Legal Services Office shall be a joint office
17 shared by the Alabama Army and Air National Guard. There shall
18 be a State Staff Judge Advocate for both the Army National
19 Guard and the Air National Guard.
20 (b) Each State Staff Judge Advocate shall do all of the
21 following:
22 (1) Perform the duties as prescribed by the Adjutant
23 General and state and federal law.
24 (2) Serve as the primary legal adviser to the Adjutant
25 General regarding the State Military Department and all
26 officers and agencies of the department his or her respective
27 military service component commander.
28 (3) Provide independent legal advice in coordination
Page 1

(3) Provide independent legal advice in coordination
HB362 Enrolled
29 with the Office of General Counsel and directly, when
30 requested, to the Director of the Joint Staff, his or her
31 respective chief of staff of each for his or her service,
32 joint staff, and to members of the his or her respective
33 military service component within the Alabama National Guard,
34 generally.
35 (4) Provide legal advice in the following areas:
36 a. Military justice.
37 b. Administration and operation of the State Military
38 Department his or her respective military service component's
39 Judge Advocate General's Corps within the Alabama Army or the
40 Air National Guard.
41 c. Business, property, and financial operations under
42 the jurisdiction and authority of the State Military
43 Department and the Armory Commission for his or her respective
44 military service component.
45 d. Administration, control, discipline, status, civil
46 relations, and activities of all State Military Department
47 personnel within his or her respective military service
48 component.
49 (5) Provide legal advice to the his or her respective
50 military component commander and, when requested, to the
51 Adjutant General, Director of the Joint Staff, chief of staff
52 of each service, and joint staff in all legal matters
53 concerning the State Military Department, including
54 environmental law, labor and civilian personnel law, contract
55 law, and fiscal and tax law his or her respective military
56 component.
Page 2

component.
HB362 Enrolled
57 (6) Develop legal office management policies and
58 procedures for his or her respective military service
59 component to accomplish all legal services within the Alabama
60 National Guard.
61 (7) Direct the his or her respective military service
62 component members of the Alabama National Guard Judge Advocate
63 General Corps in the performance of their duties, including
64 leading and managing all aspects of the Legal Service Office
65 service component's legal services.
66 (8) Exercise technical supervision over the delivery of
67 legal services in his or her respective military service
68 component of the Alabama Army and or Air National Guard and
69 all legal services personnel under the authority of the
70 Adjutant General his or her component commander.
71 (9) Certify that all judge advocates within his or her
72 respective military service component are professionally
73 qualified and maintain the highest levels of ethical and moral
74 behavior and professional proficiency to perform legal duties.
75 (10) Manage the professional legal training within the
76 Alabama National Guard his or her respective military service
77 component.
78 (11) Determine the requirements for the his or her
79 respective military service component, and the Alabama
80 National Guard's acquisition of legal research materials,
81 software, applications, and programs.
82 (12) Provide legal services to the Alabama National
83 Guard his or her respective military service component through
84 the Legal Services Office and the in coordination with the
Page 3

the Legal Services Office and the in coordination with the
HB362 Enrolled
85 Office of General Counsel.
86 (13) Direct the delivery of Alabama Army and Air
87 National Guard legal services across a broad spectrum of legal
88 disciplines, including military justice, international and
89 operational law, administrative and civil law, contract and
90 fiscal law, claims, and legal assistance.
91 "§31-2B-5
92 (a) Under the direction of the Adjutant General and in
93 coordination with the State Staff Judge Advocates, the General
94 Counsel shall do all of the following:
95 (1) Advise and support the State Staff Judge Advocates
96 on all judge advocate legal service matters.
97 (2) Advise the Adjutant General, State Military
98 Department, Governor, chief of staff of each service, and
99 Director of the Joint Staff, as necessary.
100 (3) Serve as Chief Information Officer for the Judge
101 Advocate Office of General Counsel.
102 (4) Inspect, supervise, and manage judge advocate
103 activities as directed by the State Staff Judge Advocates
104 consistently with the Adjutant General's policies and
105 directives.
106 (5) Supervise all Alabama National Guard and State
107 Military Department litigation and appeals.
108 (6) Supervise and provide advice on all contract and
109 fiscal issues.
110 (7) Supervise and provide technical guidance regarding
111 military justice and administrative law.
112 (8) Supervise the Office of General Counsel, including
Page 4

(8) Supervise the Office of General Counsel, including
HB362 Enrolled
113 employment, professional responsibility, and office management
114 matters.
115 (9) Establish policy and operational guidance for all
116 aspects of the Alabama National Guard and State Military
117 Department Legal Services Office.
118 (10) Supervise the Deputy General Counsel, associate
119 general counsels, deputy staff judge advocates, judge
120 advocates, all legal services personnel, and others who are
121 members of the Judge Advocate Legal Services Office to assist
122 the Office of General Counsel in supporting the Adjutant
123 General, State Military Department, and State Staff Judge
124 Advocates, when not in conflict.
125 (b) The Office of General Counsel full-time staff shall
126 include a general counsel, deputy general counsel, chief
127 paralegal, and associate general counsels."
128 "§31-2B-6
129 The Deputy General Counsel shall do all of the
130 following:
131 (1) Serve as director for the Legal Services Office,
132 including military justice, legal assistance, administrative
133 law, contract and fiscal law, and any other services as
134 determined and delegated by a State Staff Judge Advocate or
135 the Office of General Counsel.
136 (2) Coordinate and provide support for all legal
137 services throughout the Alabama National Guard and the State
138 Military Department under the direction of the State Staff
139 Judge Advocates and the Office of General Counsel.
140 (3) Coordinate and support the Alabama National Guard
Page 5

(3) Coordinate and support the Alabama National Guard
HB362 Enrolled
141 Army Soldier Readiness Program.
142 (4) Coordinate and provide support for all legal
143 services training in the Alabama National Guard.
144 (5) Coordinate and supervise all Alabama National Guard
145 preventative law publications.
146 (6) Provide advice and counsel to Alabama National
147 Guard SAPR/IPP Offices.
148 (7) Compile and publish the Alabama National Guard
149 Legal Services Manual upon approval by the State Staff Judge
150 Advocates and the Office of General Counsel.
151 "§31-2B-7
152 The Military Justice Associate General Counsel shall do
153 all of the following:
154 (1) Serve as coordinator of all military justice
155 matters under the direction of the State Staff Judge Advocates
156 and as delegated to the Office of General Counsel.
157 (2) Coordinate and provide support to the Chief of
158 Military Justice and all trial counsels and supporting staff.
159 (3) Provide and supervise all military justice training
160 throughout the Alabama National Guard.
161 (4) Compile and publish the Alabama Manual for
162 Courts-Martial and any supporting state regulations and
163 manuals with advice and consent of the State Staff Judge
164 Advocates, and the Chief of Military Justice, and the Office
165 of General Counsel.
166 "§31-2B-8
167 The Contract and Fiscal Law Associate General Counsel
168 shall do all of the following:
Page 6

shall do all of the following:
HB362 Enrolled
169 (1) Serve as coordinator of all contract and fiscal law
170 matters under the direction of the State Staff Judge Advocates
171 and as delegated to the Office of General Counsel.
172 (2) Coordinate and provide support to the military
173 judge advocates assigned to contract and fiscal law sections.
174 (3) Provide and supervise all contract and fiscal law
175 training throughout the Alabama National Guard and State
176 Military Department.
177 (4) Compile and publish the Alabama Manual for Contract
178 and Fiscal Law and any supporting rules and manuals with
179 advice and consent of the Adjutant General, State Staff Judge
180 Advocates, and the Office of General Counsel.
181 "§31-2B-9
182 The Administrative and Civil Law Associate General
183 Counsel shall do all of the following:
184 (1) Serve as coordinator for the Office of General
185 Counsel of all administrative and civil law matters under the
186 direction of the Adjutant General and State Military
187 Department and in coordination with the State Staff Judge
188 Advocates and as delegated to the Office of General Counsel as
189 necessary.
190 (2) Coordinate and provide support to the military
191 judge advocates assigned to administrative and civil law
192 sections.
193 (3) Provide and supervise all administrative and civil
194 law training throughout the Alabama National Guard.
195 (4) Compile and publish the Alabama Manual for
196 Administrative and Civil Law and any supporting rules and
Page 7

Administrative and Civil Law and any supporting rules and
HB362 Enrolled
197 manuals with advice and consent of the Adjutant General, State
198 Staff Judge Advocates, and the Office of General Counsel.
199 "§31-2B-10
200 The Operational Law Associate General Counsel shall do
201 all of the following:
202 (1) Serve as coordinator for the Office of General
203 Counsel of all operational law matters under the direction of
204 in coordination with the State Staff Judge Advocates and as
205 delegated to the Office of General Counsel as necessary.
206 (2) Coordinate and provide support to military judge
207 advocates assigned to administrative and civil law sections.
208 (3) Provide and supervise all military justice training
209 throughout the Alabama National Guard.
210 (4) Compile and publish the Alabama Manual for
211 Operational Law and any supporting rules and manuals with
212 advice and consent of the Adjutant General, State Staff Judge
213 Advocates, and the Office of General Counsel."
214 "§31-2B-11
215 The Legal Assistance Associate General Counsel shall do
216 all of the following:
217 (1) Serve as coordinator for the Office of General
218 Counsel of all legal assistance matters under the direction of
219 in coordination with the State Staff Judge Advocates and as
220 delegated to the Office of General Counsel necessary.
221 (2) Coordinate and provide support to military judge
222 advocates assigned to legal services sections.
223 (3) Provide and supervise all legal assistance training
224 throughout the Alabama National Guard.
Page 8

throughout the Alabama National Guard.
HB362 Enrolled
225 (4) Compile and publish the Alabama Manual for Legal
226 Assistance and any supporting rules and manuals with the
227 advice and consent of the Adjutant General, State Staff Judge
228 Advocates, and the Office of General Counsel.
229 "§31-2B-12
230 (a) Command, Wing, and Brigade Judge Advocates shall
231 provide legal services to Major Military Commands, including
232 MACOM, MAJCOM, and Wing in this state through legal offices
233 and legal sections headed by judge advocates within each
234 MACOM, MAJCOM, and Wing. Judge advocates shall be members of
235 MACOM, MAJCOM, and Wing Commanders' Staff and are designated
236 as supervisory judge advocates.
237 (b) A Supervisory Judge Advocate shall be a judge
238 advocate within an office or organization with authority over,
239 or responsibility for, the direction, coordination,
240 evaluation, or assignment of responsibilities and work of
241 subordinate lawyers, paralegals, and other non-lawyer
242 assistants within MACOM, MAJCOM, or Wing.
243 (c) The supervisory judge advocates shall include the
244 Command Judge Advocate, Staff Judge Advocate, and the Brigade
245 Judge Advocate as determined by the placement.
246 (d) The Command Judge Advocate, Staff Judge Advocate,
247 and Brigade Judge Advocate shall do all of the following:
248 (1) Advise the commander regarding legal matters and
249 assist the commander in exercising his or her duties as a part
250 of the commander's personal staff, all under the management
251 and supervision of the respective State Staff Judge Advocate.
252 (2) Assist the commander in identifying legal problems
Page 9

(2) Assist the commander in identifying legal problems
HB362 Enrolled
253 and render legal advice in support of the commander's
254 decision-making process.
255 (3) Furnish legal advice, assistance, and support
256 across the broad spectrum of military, state, and federal
257 practice, including administrative law, claims, contract, and
258 fiscal law, international and operational law, and military
259 justice; provided, all legal assistance is reserved to the
260 Legal Services Office unless otherwise determined by a State
261 Staff Judge Advocate.
262 (4) Be responsible for the efficient, effective, and
263 ethical delivery of legal services to his or her commanders
264 and commands.
265 (5) Create and maintain rating and supervisory chains
266 that comply with applicable Army standards and ensure
267 effective leadership of all legal personnel of the command
268 legal office.
269 (6) Ensure legal personnel are adequately trained to
270 accomplish the legal mission, including through local training
271 and through attendance at the Judge Advocate Center and School
272 courses, including that all judge advocate attorneys
273 accomplish continuing legal education required by the Alabama
274 State Bar.
275 (7) Appoint and assign duties of the chief paralegal,
276 trial counsel, and Deputy Command Judge Advocate, Deputy Staff
277 Judge Advocate, or Deputy Brigade Judge Advocate, as
278 appropriate, with consent of the State Staff Judge Advocate.
279 (8) Maintain written standard office procedures and
280 annex to MACOM Operation Order for Command.
Page 10

annex to MACOM Operation Order for Command.
HB362 Enrolled
281 (9) Maintain proper written reports regarding
282 investigations, separations, and military justice as directed
283 by the Office of General Counsel and State Staff Judge
284 Advocate.
285 (10) Publish an office SOP and OPORD Annex for their
286 respective commands.
287 "§31-2B-13
288 (a) In accordance with Army Regulation 27-1, all
289 paralegals and warrant officers are under the direction of a
290 State Staff Judge Advocate with supervision delegated to each
291 Command Judge Advocate, Staff Judge Advocate, or Brigade Judge
292 Advocate, as appropriate, unless employed within the Office of
293 General Counsel. All paralegals and warrant officers employed
294 within the Office of General Counsel are under the direction
295 of the General Counsel.
296 (b) Unless directed otherwise by the State Staff Judge
297 Advocate, all paralegals and warrant officers shall perform
298 only legal professional duties as outlined in their respective
299 legal service regulations.
300 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
301 1, 2026.
Page 11

1, 2026.
HB362 Enrolled
302
303
304
305
306
307
308
309
310
311 ________________________________________________
312 Speaker of the House of Representatives
313
314
315
316 ________________________________________________
317 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
318
319
320 House of Representatives
321
322 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
323 was passed by the House 24-Feb-26.
324
325 John Treadwell
326 Clerk
327
328
329
330
331
332 Senate 10-Mar-26 Passed
333
334
335
Page 12